Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1229
Displacement from dwelling; expense and dislocation allowance; schedule.

Any displaced person eligible for payments under section 76-1228 who is displaced from a dwelling and who elects to accept the payments authorized by this section in lieu of the payments authorized by section 76-1228 may receive an expense and dislocation allowance which shall be determined according to a schedule established by the head of the lead agency. In establishing the schedule authorized by this section, the head of the lead agency shall take into consideration the reasonable expenses associated with relocation and the regulations adopted and promulgated by the United States Department of Transportation under the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, Public Law 91-646, as amended.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 16.